Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB684.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 15 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall, within ninety (90) days of
submission, approve and certify:
(a) An eighty (80) hour basic training course for constables and deputy
constables which shall at least focus on basic officer skills, the Kentucky
penal code, constitutional procedures, and emergency vehicle operations;
and
(b) Acceptable topics for an annual in-service training course that are
appropriate to constables' and deputy constables' duties and
responsibilities;
that are submitted by the Kentucky Constable Association, Inc. or any other law
enforcement entity otherwise authorized by the council to conduct training
courses.
(2) (a) The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall within ninety (90) days after
approval under subsection (1) of this section, promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to allow the Kentucky
Constable Association, Inc. and any other law enforcement entity otherwise
authorized by the council to conduct the basic training course and in-
service training course submitted under subsection (1) of this section for
certification of constables and deputy constables.
(b) The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall certify the in-service training
courses submitted by the Kentucky Constable Association, Inc. and any
other law enforcement entity otherwise authorized by the council to conduct
training courses.
Page 1 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
(3) Any constable or deputy constable who has successfully completed a minimum of
eighty (80) hours of basic training certified in accordance with this section or is
certified under KRS 15.380 to 15.404 shall be recognized as a certified constable.
Certified constables shall be recognized as peace officers and shall have the
powers as set out in this section and Section 2 of this Act.
(4) In order to maintain certification, constables and deputy constables shall
complete forty (40) additional hours of in-service training each year beginning
the year after initial certification.
(5) Instructors of the basic training course and the in-service training course shall be
certified in the same manner as instructors under KRS 15.360 and 15.370.
(6) (a) Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, any constable or deputy
constable holding office on or after January 1, 2027, shall be granted the
full powers and authorities generally appliable to peace officers upon the
successful completion of the basic training course set out in this section.
(b) In addition, any constable serving in office on the effective date of this Act
who has served consecutive terms in office since December 31, 2022, shall
be recognized as a being a certified constable if that constable completes the
annual forty (40) hours in-service training course as described in this
section.
(7) Any approved provider of the basic training course and in-service training course
shall issue a certificate of completion to the person taking the basic training
course or in-service training course upon his or her successful completion, and
shall forward a copy of that certificate to the Kentucky Law Enforcement
Council. The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall track the amounts and
status of every constable's training and shall regularly notify the constables,
deputy constables, and county judges/executive of the training status of the
constables and deputy constables.
Page 2 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 15 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any constable and deputy constable having satisfied the basic training
requirement and the in-service training requirement in Section 1 of this Act as
well as constables meeting the requirements of subsection (6)(b) of Section 1 of
this Act shall be considered a peace officer as defined in KRS 446.010 and shall
possess all the powers, privileges, and immunities of a peace officer throughout
the Commonwealth, including:
(a) The power to cite and arrest;
(b) The authority to conduct traffic stops and enforce state motor vehicle laws;
and
(c) The authority to execute warrants, summonses, subpoenas, and other court
orders in all criminal and civil cases.
(2) In the event of extenuating circumstances beyond the control of a certified
constable or deputy constable that prevents the officer from completing the basic
training course or the in-service training course within the time specified in
subsection (3) or (4) of Section 1 of this Act, the executive director of the
Kentucky Law Enforcement Council or his or her designee may grant the officer
an extension of time not exceeding one hundred eighty (180) days in which to
complete the training.
(3) Any certified constable or deputy constable who fails to successfully complete the
basic training course or in-service training course within the specified time
periods, including extensions, shall lose his or her peace officer powers, and his
or her certification status shall be changed to training deficiency status. When a
certified constable or deputy constable is deficient in required training, the
Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall notify the constable, if a deputy
constable under his or her command is deficient, or the county judge/executive of
Page 3 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
the county, in the case of a constable.
(4) A certified constable or deputy constable who has lost his or her peace officer
powers due solely to his or her failure to meet the basic training or in-service
training requirements of this section may regain his or her certification status
and peace officer powers upon successful completion of the training deficiency.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 15 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The following certification categories shall exist for certified constables and deputy
constables and be exclusive of one another:
(1) "Certification status" means that the certified constable or deputy constable is
presently serving as a constable or deputy constable and has met all training
requirements. The constable or deputy constable shall have peace officer powers
as set out in Section 2 of this Act;
(2) "Inactive status":
(a) Means that:
1. The constable or deputy constable is not serving as a constable or
deputy constable on or after December 31, 2026; or
2. The constable or deputy constable is on military active duty for a
period exceeding three hundred sixty-five (365) days.
(b) A constable or deputy constable who is on inactive status and who returns to
the office of constable or deputy constable shall have certification status
restored if he or she has successfully completed the basic training course,
has not committed an act for which his or her certified status may be
revoked pursuant to Section 6 of this Act, and successfully completes an in-
service training course.
(c) A constable or deputy constable returning from inactive to certification
status after the effective date of this Act shall otherwise be eligible to serve
Page 4 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
in that office;
(3) "Training deficiency status" means that the certified constable or deputy
constable has failed to meet all in-service training course requirements. The
constable's or deputy constable's peace officer powers shall automatically
terminate, and the constable or deputy constable shall not exercise peace officer
powers in the Commonwealth until he or she has corrected the in-service training
deficiency; and
(4) "Revoked status" means that the constable or deputy constable has no peace
officer powers and his or her certification has been revoked by the Kentucky Law
Enforcement Council for one (1) or more of the reasons for revocation described
under KRS 15.391.
Section 4. KRS 70.325 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) ]Constables and deputy constables who are not certified as having completed an
eighty (80) hour basic training course under Section 1 of this Act, who have not
completed the forty (40) hours of in-service training in the time limits as set out in
Sections 1 and 2 of this Act, or are not otherwise exempted under subsection (6) of
Section 1 of this Act shall not possess[Except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, for any constable or deputy constable taking office after January 1, 2023, who
was not a constable or deputy constable in the preceding four (4) year term of office, the
powers and duties of the office of constable shall not include] the general powers of a
peace officer or police officer. The powers and duties of the office of constable shall
include:
(1)[(a)] The specific powers and duties enumerated in this chapter;
(2)[(b)] The power to distrain for his or her fees or for that of other officers as
provided in KRS 64.400;
(3)[(c)] The power to take necessary steps to stop, prevent, or bring under control any
dog found chasing or molesting wild elk or deer at any time as provided in KRS
Page 5 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
150.390;
(4)[(d)] The power[, in a county containing a city of the first class,] to serve all forms
of legal process in any child support action as provided in KRS 15.856;
(5)[(e)] The power to sell property to satisfy a lien created by a taker-up of boats,
rafts, platforms, or timber as provided in KRS 364.020;
(6)[(f)] The power to serve a warrant to levy and seize upon the baggage and other
personal property of a guest for unpaid services to the keeper of a hotel, inn,
boarding house, or house of private entertainment as provided in KRS 376.350;
(7)[(g)] The power to enforce a lien for the care of livestock as provided in KRS
376.410;
(8)[(h)] The power to execute a warrant in actions regarding forcible entry or detainers
as provided in KRS 383.210 and 383.245;
(9)[(i)] The power to serve subpoenas issued by the Parole Board as provided in KRS
439.390; and
(10)[(j)] The power to take up vagrants, kill mad dogs, kill and bury a distempered
horse, ass, or mule, kill and bury cattle, and alter a stud, jackass, or bull as provided
in KRS 64.190[.
(2) After January 1, 2023, no constable who is elected for the first time or a deputy
constable appointed pursuant to KRS 70.320 shall be granted the powers generally
applicable to peace officers and police officers unless the individual has been
certified and maintains his or her certification pursuant to KRS 15.380].
Section 5. KRS 15.856 is amended to read as follows:
[In a county containing a city of the first class, ]The provisions of KRS 454.140
notwithstanding, including those provisions related to priority of other officers, all forms
of legal process may be served in any child support action by a constable of the county
upon direction by the initiating party. A constable shall not be automatically deemed an
interested party in litigation merely by virtue of serving process on behalf of the
Page 6 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
Commonwealth.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 15 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The certification of a constable or deputy constable may, after a hearing held in
conformity with KRS Chapter 13B, be revoked by the Kentucky Law Enforcement
Council for one (1) or more of the reasons for revocation described under KRS 15.391.
Section 7. KRS 15.310 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 15.310 to 15.510, 15.990, and 15.992, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(1) "Basic training course" means the peace officer or court security officer basic
training course provided by the Department of Criminal Justice Training or a course
approved and recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council;
(2) "Certified court security officer" means a court security officer who is certified
under KRS 15.380 to 15.404;
(3) "Certified peace officer" means a peace officer who is certified under KRS 15.380
to 15.404;
(4) "Certification" means the act by the council of issuing certification to a peace
officer or court security officer who successfully completes the training
requirements pursuant to KRS 15.404 and the requirements set forth within this
chapter;
(5) "Council" means the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council established by KRS
15.310 to 15.510, 15.990, and 15.992;
(6) "Court security officer" means a person required to be certified under KRS
15.380(1)(c) and who is charged with the duties set out in KRS 70.280;
(7) "Department" means the Department of Criminal Justice Training of the Justice and
Public Safety Cabinet;
(8) "Fire investigator" means a professional firefighter, as used in KRS 95A.210, who
Page 7 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
has been appointed to investigate offenses under KRS Chapter 513 and to exercise
peace officer powers under KRS 95A.100, or a deputy fire marshal who has been
appointed to be a fire investigator and to exercise peace officer powers under KRS
227.220;
(9) "Law enforcement officer" means a member of a lawfully organized police unit or
police force of county, city or metropolitan government who is responsible for the
detection of crime and the enforcement of the general criminal laws of the state, as
well as sheriffs, constables and deputy constables, sworn deputy sheriffs, campus
police officers, law enforcement support personnel, public airport authority security
officers, and other public and federal peace officers responsible for law
enforcement;
(10) "Peace officer" means a person defined in KRS 446.010, or a fire investigator
appointed to exercise peace officer powers under KRS 95A.100 or 227.220;
(11) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet; and
(12) "Validated job task analysis" means the minimum entry level qualifications and
training requirements for peace officers in the Commonwealth based upon an actual
survey and study of police officer duties and responsibilities conducted by an entity
recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council as being competent to
conduct such a study.
Section 8. KRS 15.315 is amended to read as follows:
The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council is hereby established as an independent
administrative body of state government to be made up as follows:
(1) The Attorney General of Kentucky, the commissioner of the Department of
Kentucky State Police, the commissioner of the Department of Criminal Justice
Training, the chief of police of the Louisville Metro Police Department, the chief of
police of the Lexington-Fayette Urban County Division of Police, the chief of
police of the Bowling Green Police Department, the chief of police of the
Page 8 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
Owensboro Police Department, the director of the Northern Kentucky Police and
Sheriff's Training Center, the director of the Southern Police Institute of the
University of Louisville, the dean of the College of Justice and Safety of Eastern
Kentucky University, the president of the Kentucky Peace Officers Association, the
president of the Kentucky Association of Chiefs of Police, the Kentucky president
of the Fraternal Order of Police, the president of the Kentucky Women's Law
Enforcement Network, the president of the Kentucky Constable Association, Inc.,
and the president of the Kentucky Sheriffs' Association shall be ex officio members
of the council, as full voting members of the council by reason of their office. The
United States attorneys for the Eastern and Western Districts of Kentucky may
confer and designate a local law enforcement liaison who shall serve on the council
in an advisory capacity only without voting privileges. Each ex officio member may
designate in writing a person to represent him or her and to vote on his or her
behalf. Designees of the Department of Kentucky State Police, Department of
Criminal Justice Training, Louisville Metro Police Department, Bowling Green
Police Department, Owensboro Police Department, Northern Kentucky Police and
Sheriff's Training Center, and Lexington-Fayette Urban County Division of Police
shall be the head of the agency's training division or the agency's deputy chief or
deputy commissioner;
(2) Thirteen (13)[Twelve (12)] members shall be appointed by the Governor for terms
of four (4) years from the following classifications: a city manager or mayor from a
list of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky League of Cities, a county
judge/executive from a list of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky
Association of Counties, three (3) Kentucky sheriffs, a member of the Kentucky
State Bar Association, five (5) chiefs of police, a constable from a list of three (3)
names submitted by the Kentucky Constable Association, Inc., and a citizen of
Kentucky not coming within the foregoing classifications. No person shall serve
Page 9 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
beyond the time he or she holds the office or employment by reason of which he or
she was initially eligible for appointment. Vacancies shall be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment and the successor shall be appointed for the
unexpired term. Any member may be appointed for additional terms;
(3) No member may serve on the council with the dual membership as the
representative of more than one (1) of the aforementioned groups or the holder of
more than one (1) of the aforementioned positions. In the event that an existing
member of the council assumes a position entitling him to serve on the council in
another capacity, the Governor shall appoint an additional member from the group
concerned to prevent dual membership; and
(4) Membership on the council does not constitute a public office, and no member shall
be disqualified from holding public office by reason of his membership.
Section 9. KRS 17.190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Call location information" means the best available location information,
including but not limited to information obtained using historical cellular site
information or a mobile locator tool;
(b) "Emergency responder" has the same meaning as in KRS 194A.400;
(c) "Law enforcement agency" means any lawfully organized investigative
agency, sheriff's office, constable's office wherein the constable or one (1) or
more deputy constables possess the powers of a peace officer, police unit, or
police force of state, county, urban-county government, charter county, city,
consolidated local government, or a combination of these, responsible for the
detection of crime and the enforcement of the general criminal laws[, and
excludes constables].
(d) "Public safety answering point" has the same meaning as in KRS 65.750;
(e) "Wireless communications device" means any wireless electronic
Page 10 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
communication device that provides for voice or data communication between
two (2) or more parties, including a mobile or cellular telephone; and
(f) "Wireless telecommunications carrier" means a provider of commercial
mobile radio services, including all broadband personal communications
services, wireless radio telephone services, geographic area specialized and
enhanced specialized mobile radio services, and incumbent wide area
specialized mobile radio licenses, which offer real-time, two-way voice
services interconnected with the public switched telephone network and doing
business in this Commonwealth.
(2) (a) Upon a request from a public safety answering point or law enforcement
agency, a wireless telecommunications carrier shall provide call location
information concerning the wireless communications device of a wireless
telecommunications user to the requesting public safety answering point or
law enforcement agency, in order to respond to a call for emergency services
or in an emergency situation that involves the imminent risk of death or
serious physical injury.
(b) Local emergency responders seeking call location information under this
section shall direct inquiries to either a public safety answering point or a law
enforcement agency, and the highest ranking person on duty at the public
safety answering point or a law enforcement agency shall determine, in
consultation with the emergency responders in the jurisdiction in which the
emergency call or situation arose, whether the conditions under paragraph (a)
of this subsection are met.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, nothing in this section
prohibits a wireless telecommunications carrier from establishing protocols by
which the carrier could voluntarily disclose call location information.
(4) No cause of action shall lie in any court against any wireless telecommunications
Page 11 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
carrier or its officers, employees, or agents for providing call location information
while acting in good faith and in accordance with this section.
(5) (a) In order to facilitate requests for call location information in accordance with
this section, all wireless telecommunications carriers and all resellers of
wireless telecommunications doing business in the Commonwealth shall
submit emergency contact information to:
1. The Department of Kentucky State Police, for dissemination to law
enforcement agencies; and
2. The Kentucky 911 Services Board, as created in KRS 65.7623, for
dissemination to public safety answering points.
(b) The contact information required under this subsection shall be submitted
annually, or immediately upon any change in contact information.
(6) All public safety answering points and law enforcement agencies shall develop and
maintain policies and procedures regarding this section.
(7) Call location information gathered pursuant to this section shall not be disclosed to
any party who is not officially involved in the underlying emergency response.
Section 10. KRS 70.310 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every constable and each deputy constable appointed under KRS 70.320 shall
execute a bond in an amount of[determined sufficient by the fiscal court or the
legislative council of the urban-county government or legislative body of a
consolidated local government, the minimum amount of which shall be] ten
thousand dollars ($10,000)[, with good sureties approved by the fiscal court].
(2) The bond shall be recorded by the fiscal court with the county clerk[, and the
approval of the sureties shall be entered on the records of the fiscal court].
(3) The bond shall be renewed biennially, and more often if required by the fiscal court
or the legislative council of an urban-county government or legislative body of a
consolidated local government[. When additional security is required of the
Page 12 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
constable or deputy constable, he or she shall be given at least ten (10) days'
notice].
Section 11. KRS 15.404 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any peace officers employed or appointed after December 1, 1998, who have
not successfully completed basic training at a school certified or recognized
by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, shall within one (1) year of their
appointment or employment, successfully complete a basic training course, as
established by KRS 15.380 to 15.404[KRS 15.440], at a school certified or
recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council or receive a basic
training credit approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council under
KRS 15.440(1)(d)6.
(b) In the event of extenuating circumstances beyond the control of an officer that
prevent the officer from completing basic training within one (1) year, the
executive director of the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council[commissioner
of the department] or his or her designee may grant the officer an extension of
time, not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days, in which to complete the
training.
(c) Any peace officer who fails to successfully complete basic training within the
specified time periods, including extensions, shall lose his or her law
enforcement powers and his or her precertification status shall lapse. Further,
the peace officer shall be prohibited from serving as a peace officer for a
period of one (1) year from the date that his or her precertification lapses.
(2) (a) All peace officers with active certification status shall successfully complete
forty (40) hours of annual in-service training that has been certified or
recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, that is appropriate to
the officer's rank and responsibility and the size and location of his
department.
Page 13 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
(b) In the event of extenuating circumstances beyond the control of an officer that
prevent the officer from completing the in-service training within one (1)
year, the executive director of the Kentucky Law Enforcement
Council[commissioner of the department] or his or her designee may grant
the officer an extension of time, not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days,
in which to complete the training. If the officer is unable to complete the in-
service training due to injury or illness that prevents him or her from working
as a peace officer, the one hundred eighty (180) day extension shall begin on
the date that the officer returns to work.
(c) Any peace officer who fails to successfully complete in-service training
within the specified time periods, including extensions, shall lose his or her
law enforcement powers and his or her certification status shall be changed to
training deficiency status.
(d) When a peace officer is deficient in required training, the commissioner of the
department or his or her designee shall notify the council, which shall notify
the peace officer and his or her agency.
(e) The requirements of this subsection shall be waived for the period of time that
a peace officer is serving on active duty in the United States Armed Forces.
(f) This waiver shall be retroactive for peace officers from the date of September
11, 2001.
(3) An officer who has lost his or her law enforcement powers due solely to his or her
failure to meet the in-service training requirements of this section may regain his or
her certification status and law enforcement powers upon successful completion of
the training deficiency.
(4) (a) Any constable who is elected may apply for admission to a basic training
course, as established by KRS 15.440, at a school certified or recognized by
the Kentucky Constable Association, Inc., the Kentucky Law Enforcement
Page 14 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
Council, or the Department for Criminal Justice Training[. The constable
shall meet all precertification requirements established pursuant to KRS
15.382 for attendance. The constable shall bear all costs associated with
precertification. The constable shall bear all costs associated with completion
of the basic training course, except the costs of basic training at a course
established pursuant to KRS 15.340].
(b) The basic training course shall accept the constable for basic training so long
as [:
1. The constable meets the precertification requirements; and
2. ]the basic training course has the training capacity to instruct the constable. If
space is not available upon request, the constable or deputy constable
possessing peace officer powers at the time of application shall continue to
possess peace officer powers until training is made available to them and
they complete the training course.
Section 12. KRS 446.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in the statute laws of this state, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Action" includes all proceedings in any court of this state;
(2) "Animal" includes every warm-blooded living creature except a human being;
(3) "Attorney" means attorney-at-law;
(4) "Bequeath" and "devise" mean the same thing;
(5) "Bequest" and "legacy" mean the same thing, and embrace either real or personal
estate, or both;
(6) "Business trust" includes, except when utilized in KRS Chapter 386, a "statutory
trust" as organized under KRS Chapter 386A;
(7) "Case plan" means an individualized accountability and behavior change strategy
for supervised individuals that:
(a) Targets and prioritizes the specific criminal risk factors of the individual
Page 15 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
based upon his or her assessment results;
(b) Matches the type and intensity of supervision and treatment conditions to the
individual's level of risk, criminal risk factors, and individual characteristics,
such as gender, culture, motivational stage, developmental stage, and learning
style;
(c) Establishes a timetable for achieving specific behavioral goals, including a
schedule for payment of victim restitution, child support, and other financial
obligations; and
(d) Specifies positive and negative actions that will be taken in response to the
supervised individual's behaviors;
(8) "Certified mail" means any method of governmental, commercial, or electronic
delivery that allows a document or package to have proof of:
(a) Sending the document or package;
(b) The date the document or package was delivered or delivery was attempted;
and
(c) The signature of the receipt of the document or package;
(9) "Company" may extend and be applied to any corporation, company, person,
partnership, joint stock company, or association;
(10) "Corporation" may extend and be applied to any corporation, company, partnership,
joint stock company, or association;
(11) "Criminal risk factors" are characteristics and behaviors that, when addressed or
changed, affect a person's risk for committing crimes. The characteristics may
include but are not limited to the following risk and criminogenic need factors:
antisocial behavior; antisocial personality; criminal thinking; criminal associates;
dysfunctional family; low levels of employment or education; poor use of leisure
and recreation; and substance abuse;
(12) "Cruelty" as applied to animals includes every act or omission whereby
Page 16 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
unjustifiable physical pain, suffering, or death is caused or permitted;
(13) "Directors," when applied to corporations, includes managers or trustees;
(14) "Domestic," when applied to a corporation, partnership, business trust, or limited
liability company, means all those incorporated or formed by authority of this state;
(15) "Domestic animal" means any animal converted to domestic habitat;
(16) "Evidence-based practices" means policies, procedures, programs, and practices
proven by scientific research to reliably produce reductions in recidivism when
implemented competently;
(17) "Federal" refers to the United States;
(18) "Foreign," when applied to a corporation, partnership, limited partnership, business
trust, statutory trust, or limited liability company, includes all those incorporated or
formed by authority of any other state;
(19) "Generally accepted accounting principles" are those uniform minimum standards
of and guidelines to financial accounting and reporting as adopted by the National
Council on Governmental Accounting, under the auspices of the Municipal Finance
Officers Association and by the Financial Accounting Standards Board, under the
auspices of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants;
(20) "Graduated sanction" means any of a wide range of accountability measures and
programs for supervised individuals, including but not limited to electronic
monitoring; drug and alcohol testing or monitoring; day or evening reporting
centers; restitution centers; reentry centers; disallowance of future earned
compliance credits; rehabilitative interventions such as substance abuse or mental
health treatment; reporting requirements to probation and parole officers;
community service or work crews; secure or unsecure residential treatment facilities
or halfway houses; and short-term or intermittent incarceration;
(21) "Humane society," "society," or "Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals,"
means any nonprofit corporation, organized under the laws of this state and having
Page 17 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
as its primary purpose the prevention of cruelty to animals;
(22) "Issue," as applied to the descent of real estate, includes all the lawful lineal
descendants of the ancestors;
(23) "Land" or "real estate" includes lands, tenements, and hereditaments and all rights
thereto and interest therein, other than a chattel interest;
(24) "Legatee" and "devisee" convey the same idea;
(25) "Livestock" means cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, alpacas, llamas, buffaloes, or
any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid species;
(26) "May" is permissive;
(27) "Month" means calendar month;
(28) "Oath" includes "affirmation" in all cases in which an affirmation may be
substituted for an oath;
(29) "Owner" when applied to any animal, means any person having a property interest
in such animal;
(30) "Partnership" includes both general and limited partnerships;
(31) "Peace officer" includes sheriffs, constables and deputy constables granted police
powers, coroners, jailers, metropolitan and urban-county government correctional
officers, marshals, policemen, and other persons with similar authority to make
arrests;
(32) "Penitentiary" includes all of the state penal institutions except the houses of
reform;
(33) "Person" may extend and be applied to bodies-politic and corporate, societies,
communities, the public generally, individuals, partnerships, joint stock companies,
and limited liability companies;
(34) "Personal estate" includes chattels, real and other estate that passes to the personal
representative upon the owner dying intestate;
(35) "Pretrial risk assessment" means an objective, research-based, validated assessment
Page 18 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
tool that measures a defendant's risk of flight and risk of anticipated criminal
conduct while on pretrial release pending adjudication;
(36) "Registered mail" means any governmental, commercial, or electronic method of
delivery that allows a document or package to have:
(a) Its chain of custody recorded in a register to enable its location to be tracked;
(b) Insurance available to cover its loss; and
(c) The signature of the recipient of the document or package available to the
sender;
(37) "Regular election" means the election in even-numbered years at which members of
Congress are elected and the election in odd-numbered years at which state officers
are elected;
(38) "Risk and needs assessment" or "validated risk and needs assessment" means an
actuarial tool scientifically proven to determine a person's risk to reoffend and
criminal risk factors, that when properly addressed, can reduce that person's
likelihood of committing future criminal behavior;
(39) "Shall" is mandatory;
(40) "State" when applied to a part of the United States, includes territories, outlying
possessions, and the District of Columbia; "any other state" includes any state,
territory, outlying possession, the District of Columbia, and any foreign government
or country;
(41) "State funds" or "public funds" means sums actually received in cash or negotiable
instruments from all sources unless otherwise described by any state agency, state-
owned corporation, university, department, cabinet, fiduciary for the benefit of any
form of state organization, authority, board, bureau, interstate compact,
commission, committee, conference, council, office, or any other form of
organization whether or not the money has ever been paid into the Treasury and
whether or not the money is still in the Treasury if the money is controlled by any
Page 19 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
form of state organization, except for those funds the management of which is to be
reported to the Legislative Research Commission pursuant to KRS 42.600, 42.605,
and 42.615;
(42) "Supervised individual" means an individual placed on probation by a court or
serving a period of parole or post-release supervision from prison or jail;
(43) "Sworn" includes "affirmed" in all cases in which an affirmation may be substituted
for an oath;
(44) "Treatment" when used in a criminal justice context, means targeted interventions
that focus on criminal risk factors in order to reduce the likelihood of criminal
behavior. Treatment options may include but shall not be limited to community-
based programs that are consistent with evidence-based practices; cognitive-
behavioral programs; faith-based programs; inpatient and outpatient substance
abuse or mental health programs; and other available prevention and intervention
programs that have been scientifically proven to produce reductions in recidivism
when implemented competently. "Treatment" does not include medical services;
(45) "United States" includes territories, outlying possessions, and the District of
Columbia;
(46) "Vacancy in office," or any equivalent phrase, means such as exists when there is
an unexpired part of a term of office without a lawful incumbent therein, or when
the person elected or appointed to an office fails to qualify according to law, or
when there has been no election to fill the office at the time appointed by law; it
applies whether the vacancy is occasioned by death, resignation, removal from the
state, county or district, or otherwise;
(47) "Violate" includes failure to comply with;
(48) "Will" includes codicils; "last will" means last will and testament;
(49) "Year" means calendar year;
(50) "City" includes town;
Page 20 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
(51) Appropriation-related terms are defined as follows:
(a) "Appropriation" means an authorization by the General Assembly to expend,
from public funds, a sum of money not in excess of the sum specified, for the
purposes specified in the authorization and under the procedure prescribed in
KRS Chapter 48;
(b) "Appropriation provision" means a section of any enactment by the General
Assembly which is not provided for by KRS Chapter 48 and which authorizes
the expenditure of public funds other than by a general appropriation bill;
(c) "General appropriation bill" means an enactment by the General Assembly
that authorizes the expenditure of public funds in a branch budget bill as
provided for in KRS Chapter 48;
(52) "Mediation" means a nonadversarial process in which a neutral third party
encourages and helps disputing parties reach a mutually acceptable agreement.
Recommendations by mediators are not binding on the parties unless the parties
enter into a settlement agreement incorporating the recommendations;
(53) "Biennium" means the two (2) year period commencing on July 1 in each even-
numbered year and ending on June 30 in the ensuing even-numbered year;
(54) "Branch budget bill" or "branch budget" means an enactment by the General
Assembly which provides appropriations and establishes fiscal policies and
conditions for the biennial financial plan for the judicial branch, the legislative
branch, and the executive branch, which shall include a separate budget bill for the
Transportation Cabinet;
(55) "AVIS" means the automated vehicle information system established and
maintained by the Transportation Cabinet to collect titling and registration
information on vehicles and boats and information on holders of motor vehicle
operator's licenses and personal identification cards;
(56) "Cooperative," except in KRS Chapter 272, includes a limited cooperative
Page 21 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
association; and
(57) "Unmanned aircraft system" means an aircraft that is operated without the
possibility of direct human interaction from within or on the aircraft and includes
everything that is on board or otherwise attached to the aircraft and all associated
elements, including communication links and the components that control the small
unmanned aircraft that are required for the safe and efficient operation of the
unmanned aircraft in the national airspace system.
Section 13. KRS 189.910 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in KRS 189.920 to 189.950, "emergency vehicle" means any vehicle used
for emergency purposes by:
(a) The Department of Kentucky State Police;
(b) A public police department;
(c) The Department of Corrections;
(d) A sheriff's office;
(e) A rescue squad;
(f) An emergency management agency if it is a publicly owned vehicle;
(g) A licensed ambulance service, mobile integrated healthcare program, or
medical first response provider licensed by the Kentucky Board of Emergency
Medical Services, for any vehicle used to respond to emergencies or to
transport a patient with a critical medical condition;
(h) Any vehicle commandeered by a peace[police] officer;
(i) Any vehicle with the emergency lights required under KRS 189.920 used by a
paid or volunteer fireman or paid or volunteer ambulance personnel, or a paid
or local emergency management director while responding to an emergency
or to a location where an emergency vehicle is on emergency call;
(j) An elected coroner granted permission to equip a publicly or privately owned
motor vehicle with lights and siren pursuant to KRS 189.920;
Page 22 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
(k) A deputy coroner granted permission to equip a publicly or privately owned
motor vehicle with lights and siren pursuant to KRS 189.920;
(l) Any vehicle used by an organ procurement organization while transporting a
human organ or tissue for the purpose of organ recovery or transplantation in
an emergency situation involving an imminent health risk;[ or]
(m) A game warden of the Kentucky Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources;
or
(n) Any vehicle used for official law enforcement purposes by a constable or
deputy constable possessing the powers of a peace officer.
(2) As used in KRS 189.920 to 189.950, "public safety vehicle" means public utility
repair vehicle; wreckers; state, county, or municipal service vehicles and
equipment; highway equipment which performs work that requires stopping and
standing or moving at slow speeds within the traveled portions of highways; and
vehicles which are escorting wide-load or slow-moving trailers or trucks.
Section 14. KRS 189.950 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] motor vehicle, except those designated under KRS 189.910 to 189.950 as
emergency vehicles, shall not be equipped with, and a[ nor shall any] person shall
not use upon a vehicle, any siren, whistle, or bell. Any vehicle may be equipped
with a theft alarm signal device which shall be so arranged that it cannot be used as
an ordinary warning signal.
(2) A[No] motor vehicle, except those designated under KRS 189.910 to 189.950 as
emergency vehicles, shall not be equipped with, and a[nor shall any] person shall
not use upon a vehicle any red or blue flashing, revolving, or oscillating light or
place a red light on the front thereof. This subsection shall not apply to the use of
red flashing lights on school buses or to stop lights or turn signals at the rear of any
motor vehicle.
(3) Except as otherwise provided for in this section, a person shall not illuminate a blue
Page 23 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
light that is affixed to a motor vehicle while operating the motor vehicle on a
highway. This subsection shall not apply to:
(a) Any light on a motorcycle that is not affixed to the front of the motorcycle; or
(b) Nonhalogen headlamps that have a slight blue tint and meet United States
Department of Transportation regulations.
(4) A[No] motor vehicle, except those designated under KRS 189.910 to 189.950 as
public safety vehicles, shall not be equipped with, and a[nor shall any] person shall
not use upon any vehicle any yellow flashing, revolving, or oscillating light. This
subsection shall not apply to the use of yellow lights for turn signals; or to
emergency flasher lights for use when warning the operators of other vehicles of the
presence of a vehicular traffic requiring the exercise of unusual care in approaching,
overtaking, or passing; or to vehicles operated by mail carriers while on duty;
funeral escort vehicles and church buses.
(5) Any person who is a regular or voluntary member of any fire department furnishing
fire protection for a political subdivision of the state or any person who is a regular
or voluntary member of a rescue squad may equip his or her vehicle with red
flashing, rotating, or oscillating lights and a siren, bell, or exhaust whistle if he or
she has first been given permission, in writing, to do so by the chief of the fire
department or rescue squad. He or she may use such lights and equipment only
while proceeding to the scene of a fire or other emergency or to a location where
another emergency vehicle is on emergency call in the performance of his or her
official duties as a member of a fire department or rescue squad.
(6) (a) Any constable without peace officer powers[meeting the requirements of
KRS 70.325(2)] may, upon approval of the fiscal court in the county of
jurisdiction, the legislative council of an urban-county government, or the
legislative body of a consolidated local government, equip vehicles used by
said officer as emergency vehicles with one (1) or more flashing, rotating or
Page 24 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
oscillating blue lights, visible under normal atmospheric condition from a
distance of five hundred (500) feet to the front of such vehicle, and a siren,
whistle or bell, capable of emitting a sound audible under normal conditions
from a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet. This equipment shall
be in addition to any other equipment required by the motor vehicle laws. Any
constable authorized by the fiscal court to utilize blue lights and a siren
pursuant to this section shall maintain at least the insurance described by KRS
304.39-110.
(b) 1. Any constable who has successfully completed a basic training course,
as established by KRS 15.440, at a school certified or recognized by the
Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, and who maintains his or her
certification as a peace officer pursuant to KRS 15.380 through his or
her term of office as a constable, or otherwise possesses the powers of a
peace officer, may equip vehicles used by that officer as emergency
vehicles with one (1) or more flashing, rotating, or oscillating blue
lights, visible under normal atmospheric conditions from a distance of
five hundred (500) feet to the front of the vehicle, and a siren, whistle,
or bell, capable of emitting a sound audible under normal conditions
from a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet. This equipment
shall be in addition to any other equipment required by the motor
vehicle laws. Any constable authorized to use blue lights and a siren
pursuant to this section shall maintain at least the insurance described by
KRS 304.39-110.
2. The fiscal court in the county of jurisdiction, the legislative council of
an urban-county government, or the legislative body of a consolidated
local government may revoke this authorization, if the fiscal court, the
council, or the body determines an issue of public safety or abuse by the
Page 25 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2075
constable.
(7) Any person who is a paid or voluntary member of any ambulance service furnishing
emergency medical services for a political subdivision of the state may equip his or
her vehicle with red flashing, rotating, or oscillating lights and a siren, bell, or
exhaust whistle if he or she has first been given permission, in writing, to do so by
the chief or director of the ambulance service. He or she may use such lights and
equipment only while proceeding to the scene of an emergency, a medical facility,
or to a location where another emergency vehicle is on emergency call in the
performance of his or her official duties as a member of the ambulance service.
Section 15. This Act may be cited as the Richard Lee VanHoose Act.
Section 16. Whereas it is of the most utmost urgency that constables and deputy
constables all across the Commonwealth be given the opportunity to have their peace
officer powers restored through experience and education, an emergency is declared to
exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its
otherwise becoming a law.
Page 26 of 26
BR207500.100 - 2075 - XXXX 2/19/2026 3:06 PM Jacketed